Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 8

State Facilities

33-2-801. Chief officers of hospitals and developmental centers — Appointment — Authority.

The commissioner shall appoint a chief officer for each facility to serve at the pleasure of the commissioner.

The commissioner shall appoint chief officers of facilities without regard to residence on the basis of merit as measured by administrative abilities and a demonstrated quality of leadership. The chief officer shall hold a recognized degree as a psychiatrist, doctor of medicine, behavioral scientist, social scientist, public administrator, hospital administrator, or other profession involved with human development, human welfare, or health administration.

Chief officers have all of the authority conferred upon them by this title and such other authority as is delegated to them by the commissioner. Chief officers have the authority to administer oaths.

Acts 1965, ch. 82, § 10; 1971, ch. 411, § 2; 1974, ch. 802, § 9; 1978, ch. 617, § 3; T.C.A., § 33-203; Acts 1985, ch. 437, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-2-103; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 2, §§ 33-2-101 — 33-2-108, 33-2-201 — 33-2-202, 33-2-301 — 33-2-311, 33-2-401, 33-2-501 — 33-2-513, 33-2-601 — 33-2-602, 33-2-604, 33-2-701, 33-2-901 — 33-2-909 (Acts 1965, ch. 82, § 8; 1973, ch. 341, §§ 3, 4; 1974, ch. 802, § 8; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 3; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(35); 1978, ch. 617, § 2; 1978, ch. 853, §§ 1-9, 11-13; 1979, ch. 199, § 1; 1979, ch. 369, § 1; 1981, ch. 18, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 5; 1981, ch. 436, §§ 1, 4, 5; 1981, ch. 436, § 3; 1982, ch. 584, §§ 2, 4-12; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 25-28, 31; 33-201, T.C.A. § 33-350, 33-1801, T.C.A., §§ 33-1803 — 33-1812, T.C.A., §§ 33-1902 — 33-1911; 1985, ch. 437, § 5, 31-32; 1987, ch. 143, §§ 1, 6; 1987, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 1987, ch. 320, § 1; 1988, ch. 586, § 1; 1988, ch. 828, §§ 3-8; 1988, ch. 875, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 253, § 3; 1989, ch. 254, § 3; 1989, ch. 255, § 2; 1989, ch. 256, § 2; 1989, ch. 257, § 3; 1989, ch. 259, § 3; 1989, ch. 260, § 3; 1989, ch. 261, § 3; 1989, ch. 271, § 3; 1989, ch. 272, § 3; 1989, ch. 434, § 5; 1989, ch. 513, §§ 1, 14; 1989, ch. 559, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 591, § 112; 1991, ch. 459, §§ 9, 10; 1992, ch. 913, § 2; 1993, ch. 234, §§ 22-26; 1994, ch. 760, § 1; 1996, ch. 796, § 1; 1996, ch. 1074, § 1; 1998, ch. 1005, § 1-9; 2000, ch. 947, § 6); § 33-2-603 (Acts 1985, ch. 437, § 31; 1987, ch. 143, § 5), which had been previously repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 586, § 2; § 33-2-801 (Acts 1989, ch. 513, § 4), which had been previously repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 234, § 9; §§ 33-2-802 and 33-2-803 (Acts 1989, ch. 513, § 4), which were transferred to §§ 68-24-602, 68-24-603 in 1993, is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

33-2-802. Bond of chief officer.

Each chief officer shall give an official bond, in a sum to be fixed by the commissioner of finance and administration, the comptroller of the treasury and the state treasurer, to be executed, conditioned and filed in accordance with title 8, chapter 19. The cost of the bond shall be paid from funds available to the facility.

Acts 1965, ch. 82, § 11; 1974, ch. 802, § 10; T.C.A., §§ 33-204, 33-2-104; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-2-803. Powers and duties of chief officers.

The chief officer shall be under the direction of the commissioner and has the following powers and duties to:

Exercise general superintendence over all matters relating to the facility;

Perform the duties of a treasurer of the facility without any additional compensation, depositing all moneys coming into the chief officer's hands in some one of the banks designated as state depositories, for safekeeping, until drawn out from time to time for the benefit of the facility; and

Make reports as the commissioner may require.

The chief officer shall be authorized to make written application to the governor for issuance of requisition papers for the purpose of returning any person to the state who has left a facility without authorization and fled from the state when the person with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability had been committed to the facility or the custody of the commissioner. The application shall be in the same form as required for the return of a fugitive from justice.

Chapter 4, part 2 of this title, to the extent that its application would be contrary to other statutes or to federal law, shall not apply to money or funds that are paid to the chief officer of a facility by the veterans' administration.

Acts 1965, ch. 82, § 12; 1969, ch. 107, § 1; 1973, ch. 127, § 2; 1974, ch. 802, § 11; 1975, ch. 248, § 1; 1981, ch. 224, § 1; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 1-3; T.C.A., § 33-205; Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 3; 1985, ch. 437, §§ 2-4; T.C.A., § 33-2-105; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-2-804. Officials prohibited from trafficking in supplies.

Officials connected with management of any of the department's facilities are prohibited from contracting to furnish any supplies or equipment for use in the operation or support of the facility, and any official who violates this section shall forfeit the right to serve as the official.

Acts 1965, ch. 82, § 13; 1974, ch. 802, § 12; T.C.A., §§ 33-206, 33-2-106; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-2-805. Police powers of security guards.

The security guards at all department facilities and other personnel the commissioner may designate are vested with the powers and authority of peace officers and shall exercise the powers and authority on the grounds of facilities under the supervision of the department.

Acts 1965, ch. 82, § 14; 1974, ch. 802, § 13; 1975, ch. 248, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 33-207, 33-2-107; Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6.

33-2-806. Trespassing on hospital or developmental center grounds — Penalty.

The enclosed premises and the adjoining land belonging to or used by and for any of the state facilities, are private grounds. If a person goes on the premises without authority or permission, the person commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1965, ch. 82, § 15; 1974, ch. 802, § 14; T.C.A., § 33-208; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; T.C.A., § 33-2-108; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.